Utah statutes.
32B-10-203.   Renewal of special use permit.

(1)  A special use permit expires on December 31 of each year unless otherwise provided on the special use permit.

(2)  To renew a renewable special use permit, a person shall submit a completed renewal application to the department:

(a)  no later than November 30; and

(b)  in a form prescribed by the department.

(3)  Failure to meet the renewal requirements results in an automatic forfeiture of the special use permit, effective on the date the existing special use permit expires.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

